Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-222.01
Emergency response systems; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that matters relating to emergency medical first response and fire protection are matters of state concern, particularly in larger cities that rely primarily or entirely upon volunteers to provide these services. Recognizing the increasing complexity and difficulty of providing these services, the stringent and growing training demands made upon volunteers, the demographics of an aging population, the economic pressures that deny or inhibit employers from granting the opportunity for volunteers to respond to emergency calls during business hours, and the economic costs to residents and businesses of financing either a paid or partly paid emergency response system, the Legislature hereby declares the necessity of establishing a system and process whereby certain cities of the first class would be required to review, study, and modify on a continuing basis their emergency response systems, with appropriate public input, based upon local conditions and circumstances.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 1.